Maryland, session 2025, SB0042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0042*

SENATE BILL 42
(b) “Area of nontidal inundation” means an area within the State which is subject
to inundation caused predominately by accumulated surface runoff or excess rainfall runoff,
or both.
(c) “Area of tidal inundation” means an area within the State which is subject to
inundation caused predominately by tides or wind–driven waters, or both.
(d) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(e) “Federal flood insurance program” means the program established by the
National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended.
(f) “Flood hazard area” means an area of tidal or nontidal inundation resulting
from a 100–year flood event and established pursuant to the provisions of § 5–803 of this
subtitle.
(G) “HEADWATER STREAM” MEANS:
(1) THE SOURCE OF A STREAM OR RIVER, LOCATED AT THE FURTHEST
POINT FROM WHERE THE WATER BODY EMPTIES OR MERGES WITH ANOTHER; OR
(2) A SMALL STREAM OR WETLAND AT THE HIGHEST END OF A
WATERSHED.
(H) “INTERJURISDICTIONAL WATERSHED” MEANS AN AREA OF LAND
SITUATED ON TWO OR MORE JURISDICTIONS THAT DRAINS ALL THE STREAMS AND
RAINFALL TO A COMMON OUTLET, SUCH AS THE OUTFLOW OF A RESERVOIR, MOUTH
OF A BAY, OR ANY POINT ALONG A STREAM CHANNEL.
[(g)] (I) “100–year flood event” or “100–year flood” means a flood that has a 1%
chance of being equalled or exceeded in any given year.
[(h)] (J) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.
[(i)] (K) “Subdivision” means:
(1) Any county, including Baltimore City; and
(2) Any incorporated municipality which has the authority to adopt and
enforce land use and control measures for the areas within its jurisdiction.
5–803.
(d) (1) (I) By July 1, 1990 each subdivision, in cooperation with the
Departments of the Environment and Agriculture, the Department of Planning, and other
appropriate State agencies, shall prepare a flood management plan based upon an

SENATE BILL 42 3
evaluation of the alternative management techniques and other findings included in
studies conducted under subsection (b) of this section.
(II) Each flood management plan shall be consistent with the
purposes and provisions of this subtitle.
(2) Management techniques may include:
(i) Flood control dams;
(ii) Levees and dikes;
(iii) Stormwater detention or retention structures;
(iv) Public acquisition;
(v) Flood proofing;
(vi) Storm drain and stream maintenance;
(vii) Tax adjustment policies;
(viii) Subdivision, zoning, and related ordinances; and
(ix) Other practical methods.
(3) Management techniques shall include flood warning systems.
(e) (1) (I) In any interjurisdictional watershed, those portions of the flood
management plans of the subdivisions relating to the watershed shall be subject to review
and approval by the Department as one plan.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGNATE AT LEAST THE
FOLLOWING WATERSHEDS AND ALL THEIR HEADWATERS AND TRIBUTARIES AS
INTERJURISDICTIONAL FLOOD HAZARD WATERSHEDS:
1. CARROLL CREEK IN FREDERICK CITY AND
FREDERICK COUNTY;
2. GWYNNS FALLS IN BALTIMORE CITY AND
BALTIMORE COUNTY;
3. JONES FALLS IN BALTIMORE CITY AND BALTIMORE
COUNTY; AND

SENATE BILL 42
4. HERRING RUN, INCLUDING THE HERRING RUN
STREAM IN BALTIMORE CITY AND THE HERRING RUN HEADWATERS IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY.
(2) (I) Any comprehensive flood management plan which includes a
project for which grant funds are requested under this section is subject to review and
approval by the Department.
(II) If a plan is disapproved, the Secretary shall set forth in writing
the reason for disapproval.
(III) Disapproval of a plan shall be based only on flood management
considerations.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.